Maine, session 132, LD1836.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §11273, sub-§15, ¶A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 377, §4, is
further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (3-B) to read:
(3-B) Title 17-A, section 255-A, subsection 1, paragraph D, regardless of the age
of the victim, if the crime is committed on or after October 1, 2025;
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR2412(02)